Illinois, session 104th, HB5136.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Fish and Aquatic Life Code is amended by 5changing Sections 1-10, 1-120, 5-25, 10-20, 10-25, 10-50, 610-70, 10-75, 10-95, 10-140, 10-150, 15-50, 15-60, 15-100, 715-120, 15-125, 15-130, 15-145, 20-5, 20-10, 20-45, 20-50, 820-90, 20-95, and 20-105 as follows: 9    (515 ILCS 5/1-10)  (from Ch. 56, par. 1-10)10    Sec. 1-10. Definitions. As used in this Code: Code, terms 11are defined according to the following Sections.12    "Administrative rule" means a regulatory measure issued by 13the Director under this Code.14    "Air rifle" means an air gun, air pistol, spring gun, gas 15gun, spring pistol, B-B gun, pellet gun, or any implement that 16is not a firearm and propels a singular globular projectile or 17pellet constructed of steel, lead, or other hard materials by 18the use of compressed air, compressed gas, or spring power.19    "Angling methods" means the action of sport fishing by 20hook and line.21    "Aquatic life" means all fish, mollusks, crustaceans, 22algae, aquatic plants, aquatic invertebrates, and any other 23aquatic animals or plants that the Department identifies in   HB5136 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1administrative rules adopted after consultation with 2biologists, zoologists, or other wildlife experts. "Aquatic 3life" does not mean any herptiles that are found in the 4Herptiles-Herps Act.5    "Aquatic life farm" means property: (i) containing any or 6a combination of levee ponds, a strip mine lake, or other type 7of lake that has floating cages, raceways, or other aquatic 8life rearing equipment and (ii) where the owner of the aquatic 9life farm has posted a conspicuous written notice to that 10effect. If more than one person owns or has title to the lake, 11"aquatic life farm" means the area of the lake containing the 12floating cages, raceways, or other aquatic life rearing 13equipment.14    "Authorized employee" means all sworn members of the Law 15Enforcement Division and those specifically granted law 16enforcement authorization by the Director.17    "Blow gun" means a weapon, hunting, or fishing device 18consisting of a tube through which an arrow, dart, or 19projectile is propelled by force of the breath of a person.20    "Combination license" means an electronic or physical 21license authorizing the person to take a certain type of fish 22or animal during a specified period of time.23    "Contraband" applies to all aquatic life or any part of 24aquatic life taken, bought, sold or bartered, shipped, or held 25in possession, or any conveyance, vehicle, watercraft, or 26other means of transportation whatever, except sealed railroad   HB5136 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1cars or other common carriers, used to transport or ship any 2part of aquatic life so taken, contrary to this Code, 3including administrative rules, or used to transport, contrary 4to this Code, including administrative rules, any of the 5previously specified species when taken illegally.6    "Daily limit" means the maximum amount of aquatic life 7that a properly licensed individual is permitted to take in 8any one day.9    "Department" means the Department of Natural Resources.10    "Director" means the Director of Natural Resources.11    "Dressed" means having the head removed.12    "Fishing" means taking or attempting to take aquatic life 13in any waters of the State, by any method, and all other acts 14such as placing, setting, drawing, or using any device 15commonly used for the taking of aquatic life whether resulting 16in taking or not.17    "Fishing license" means an electronic or physical license 18authorizing the person to take a certain type of fish during a 19specified period of time.20    "Hybrid" means the offspring resulting from the 21crossbreeding of 2 different species.22    "Indigenous species" means those species of aquatic life 23specified by administrative rule.24    "Individual" means a natural person.25    "Inland trout stamp" means a special stamp issued by the 26Department authorizing taking or attempting to take trout in   HB5136 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1all waters except Lake Michigan.2    "Minnow" means any fish in the family Leuciscidae.3    "Mussel devices" includes any rake, fork, crow-foot bar, 4dredge, or air-breathing device described as follows: (i) rake 5or fork: any rake or fork with forks or tines used for 6collecting or assembling mussels; (ii) crow-foot bar: a bar of 7any material equipped with a series of hooks designed to take 8mussels by the insertion of the hooks between the shells of 9mussels; (iii) dredge: any hand-operated dredge with openings 10not larger than 2 feet in width used for taking mussels; and 11(iv) air-breathing device: any air-breathing apparatus that is 12attached to a diver and is used during the collecting of 13mussels.14    "Mussels" means any fresh water mussel or the shell of a 15mussel.16    "Person" includes the plural "persons", females as well as 17males, and shall extend and be applied to clubs, associations, 18corporations, firms, and partnerships as well as individuals.19    "Resident" means a person who in good faith makes 20application for any license or permit and verifies by 21statement that he or she has maintained his or her permanent 22abode in this State for a period of at least 30 consecutive 23days immediately preceding the person's application, and who 24does not maintain permanent abode or claim residency in 25another state for the purposes of obtaining any of the same or 26similar licenses or permits covered by this Code. A person's   HB5136 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1permanent abode is his or her fixed and permanent dwelling 2place, as distinguished from a temporary or transient place of 3residence. Domiciliary intent is required to establish that 4the person is maintaining his or her permanent abode in this 5State. Evidence of domiciliary intent includes, but is not 6limited to, the location where the person votes, pays personal 7income tax, or obtains a driver's license. Except for the 8purposes of obtaining a lifetime license, any person on active 9duty in the Armed Forces shall be considered a resident of 10Illinois during his or her period of military duty.11    "Resident commercial fisherman" means an individual who 12has actually resided in Illinois for one year immediately 13preceding his or her application for a commercial fishing 14license and who does not claim residency for a commercial 15fishing license in another state or country.16    "Resident commercial musselor" means an individual who has 17actually resided in Illinois for one year immediately 18preceding his or her application for a commercial mussel 19license and who does not claim residency for a commercial 20mussel license in another state or country.21    "Roe" means the eggs of fish that are whole and intact 22within the egg sac, whether within the body cavity of the fish 23or removed. "Roe" does not include eggs removed from the egg 24sac.25    "Roe-bearing species" means sturgeon, paddlefish, bowfin, 26and any other fish listed as such by the Department in an   HB5136 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1administrative rule.2    "Salmon" includes all the salmons and trouts.3    "Salmon stamp" means a special stamp issued by the 4Department authorizing taking or attempting to take salmon in 5Lake Michigan.6    "Sport fisherman" means an individual who uses or attempts 7to use sport fishing devices as stated in Sections 10-95, 810-110, and 10-140.9    "Take" means lure, kill, destroy, capture, gig or spear, 10trap or ensnare, or attempt to do so.11    "Taxidermy" means the art of preparing, preserving, and 12mounting the skins of fish, birds, or mammals to make them 13appear lifelike.14    "Transport" or "ship" means to convey by parcel post, 15express, freight, baggage, or shipment by common carrier of 16any description; by automobile, motorcycle, or other vehicle 17of any kind; by water or aircraft of any kind; or by any other 18means of transportation. 19(Source: P.A. 87-833.) 20    (515 ILCS 5/1-120)  (from Ch. 56, par. 1-120)21    Sec. 1-120. Seasons; daily limits. The seasons during 22which protected aquatic life may be taken and the length size 23limits and daily catch limits set out in this Code are based 24upon a proper biological balance and shall be regulated by 25administrative rule.  HB5136 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1    The Department may not provide for a longer season or a 2larger daily catch limit than is provided in this Code, except 3as provided by Section 1-150.4    The Department shall modify existing provisions, when 5necessary, including open seasons, length size limits, quotas, 6limited entry, and methods of taking fish from the waters of 7Lake Michigan under the jurisdiction of the State of Illinois, 8in order that the compact between the Canadian provinces and 9those States of the United States adjacent to the Great Lakes, 10including the United States and Canadian Governments, may be 11fulfilled in the best interests of the fisheries resources and 12the general public.13    Employees or agents of any federal, State, or municipal 14government or body, when engaged in investigative work, may by 15prior written approval of the Director be exempted from this 16Code.17(Source: P.A. 87-833.) 18    (515 ILCS 5/5-25)  (from Ch. 56, par. 5-25)19    Sec. 5-25. Value of protected species; violations. 20    (a) Any person who, for profit or commercial purposes, 21knowingly captures or kills, possesses, offers for sale, 22sells, offers to barter, barters, offers to purchase, 23purchases, delivers for shipment, ships, exports, imports, 24causes to be shipped, exported, or imported, delivers for 25transportation, transports or causes to be transported,   HB5136 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1carries or causes to be carried, or receives for shipment, 2transportation, carriage, or export any aquatic life, or parts 3thereof, contrary to the provisions of the Code or 4administrative rule, and that aquatic life, in whole or in 5part, is valued at or in excess of a total of $300, as per 6species value specified in subsection (c) of this Section, 7commits a Class 3 felony.8    A person is guilty of a Class 4 felony if convicted under 9this Section for more than one violation within a 90-day 10period if the aquatic life involved in each violation are not 11valued at or in excess of $300 but the total value of the 12aquatic life involved with the multiple violations is at or in 13excess of $300. The prosecution for a Class 4 felony for these 14multiple violations must be alleged in a single charge or 15indictment and brought in a single prosecution. 16    Any person who violates this subsection (a) when the total 17value of species is less than $300 commits a Class A 18misdemeanor except as otherwise provided. 19    (b) Possession of aquatic life, in whole or in part, 20captured or killed in violation of this Code, valued at or in 21excess of $600, as per species value specified in subsection 22(c) of this Section, shall be considered prima facie evidence 23of possession for profit or commercial purposes.24    (c) For purposes of this Section, the fair market value or 25replacement cost, whichever is greater, must be used to 26determine the value of the species, but in no case shall the   HB5136 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1minimum value of all aquatic life and their hybrids, whether 2dressed or not dressed, be less than the following:3        (1) For each muskellunge or muskellunge hybrid, 4    northern pike, walleye or walleye hybrid, striped bass or 5    striped bass hybrid, sauger, largemouth bass, smallmouth 6    bass, spotted bass, trout (all species), salmon (all 7    species other than chinook caught from August 1 through 8    December 31), bowfin, paddlefish, and sturgeon (other than 9    pallid or lake sturgeon) of a weight, dressed or not 10    dressed, of one pound or more, $4 for each pound or 11    fraction of a pound. For each individual fish with a 12    dressed or not dressed weight of less than one pound, $4. 13    For parts of fish processed past the dressed state, $8 per 14    pound.15        (2) For each warmouth, rock bass, white bass, yellow 16    bass, sunfish (all species except largemouth, smallmouth, 17    and spotted bass), bluegill, crappie, bullheads, 18    pickerels, yellow perch, catfish (all species), and 19    mussels of a weight, dressed or not dressed, of one pound 20    or more, $4 for each pound or fraction of a pound of 21    aquatic life. For each individual aquatic life with a 22    dressed or not dressed weight of less than one pound, $4. 23    For aquatic life parts processed past the dressed state, 24    $8 per pound.25        (3) (Blank).26        (4) (Blank).  HB5136 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1        (5) For goldeye, mooneye, carp, carpsuckers (all 2    species), suckers (all species), redhorse (all species), 3    buffalo (all species), freshwater drum, skipjack, shad 4    (all species), alewife, smelt, gar, chinook salmon caught 5    from August 1 through December 31, and all other aquatic 6    life, not listed in this paragraph or paragraph paragraphs 7    (1) or , (2), or (5) of this subsection (c) of this 8    Section, $1 per pound, in part or in whole.9        (6) For each species listed on the federal or State 10    endangered and threatened species list, and for lake and 11    pallid sturgeon, $150 per animal in whole or in part. 12(Source: P.A. 102-368, eff. 1-1-22.) 13    (515 ILCS 5/10-20)  (from Ch. 56, par. 10-20)14    Sec. 10-20. Length Size limit; northern pike. All northern 15pike in the possession of any individual shall be not less than 1624 inches in length, except that northern pike of any length 17size may be possessed that are taken in the waters of the 18Mississippi River.19(Source: P.A. 87-833.) 20    (515 ILCS 5/10-25)  (from Ch. 56, par. 10-25)21    Sec. 10-25. Daily limit; northern pike, sauger, and 22walleye. 23    (a) Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c), all 24properly licensed individuals shall be permitted to take, in   HB5136 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1any one day, no more than 3 northern pike, 6 sauger, 6 or 2walleye or their hybrids, or 6 in the aggregate of sauger and 3walleye or their hybrids.4    (b) In the waters of the Mississippi River between Iowa 5and Illinois, all properly licensed individuals shall be 6permitted to take, in any one day, no more than 5 northern 7pike, 10 sauger or walleye, or 10 in the aggregate of sauger 8and walleye.9    (c) In the waters of the Mississippi River between 10Missouri and Illinois, all properly licensed individuals shall 11be permitted to take, in any one day, no more than one northern 12pike, 8 sauger or walleye, or 8 in the aggregate of sauger and 13walleye.14(Source: P.A. 87-833.) 15    (515 ILCS 5/10-50)  (from Ch. 56, par. 10-50)16    Sec. 10-50. Length Size limit; trout and salmon. All 17rainbow trout, lake trout, brown trout, brook trout, Atlantic 18salmon, coho salmon, chinook salmon, pink salmon, or other 19salmonids when taken or in the possession of a person after 20having been taken from the waters of Lake Michigan shall be not 21less than 10 inches in length.22(Source: P.A. 87-833.) 23    (515 ILCS 5/10-70)  (from Ch. 56, par. 10-70)24    Sec. 10-70. Aquatic life included in daily limit.   HB5136 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1    (a) Any aquatic life taken into actual possession, unless 2released unharmed immediately, shall be included in the daily 3limit of the person having so taken the aquatic life for the 4day when taken.5    (b) Fish released unharmed by participants in a bona fide 6catch-and-release fishing tournament, which requires the 7participants to have a boat live well with a pump constantly 8adding fresh or recirculating water, shall not be included in 9the daily limit. However, at no time may the daily limit be 10exceeded.11    (c) All individuals licensed under this Code are permitted 12to take on a daily basis no more than the daily limit of 13aquatic life that is established by this Code, including any 14limits established by administrative rule under this Code. 15(Source: P.A. 87-833; 88-3.) 16    (515 ILCS 5/10-75)  (from Ch. 56, par. 10-75)17    Sec. 10-75. Application of Article. This Article 10 shall 18apply only to aquatic life in waters and lands wholly or in 19part within the boundaries of the State of Illinois.20    The provisions of Sections 10-5 through 10-75 are subject 21to modification by administrative rule.22    Aquatic life legally taken in and transported from other 23states or countries may be possessed within the State of 24Illinois, subject to the provisions of Sections 15-55 and 2515-60 of this Code.  HB5136 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1    Any aquatic life taken at any time except during an open 2season established under this Code, including administrative 3rules, or of a length size less than the minimum provided by 4this Code, including administrative rules, shall be 5immediately returned, without unnecessary injury, to the 6waters from which taken.7(Source: P.A. 87-833.) 8    (515 ILCS 5/10-95)  (from Ch. 56, par. 10-95)9    Sec. 10-95. Number of hooks; untagged devices. Any 10individual possessing a valid sport fishing license may take 11aquatic life by hand, or may use pole and line, bank pole and 12line, throw line, trotline, buoyed ganging devices, or other 13legal devices not exceeding 50 hooks in the aggregate; , 14however, any individual at any one time is allowed to use under 15his or her immediate control only 2 untagged sport fishing 16devices and any additional devices up to the aggregate of 50 17hooks must be tagged with his or her name, and mailing address, 18and phone number. It shall be unlawful to sell or barter any 19aquatic life or parts thereof taken by sport fishing devices.20    A dip net for non-commercial smelt fishing in Lake 21Michigan may be used subject to the provisions of Section 2210-40.23    Dip nets that are subject to the provisions of Section 2415-120 may be used to take carp, buffalo, carpsuckers, or shad 25for personal consumption. The taking of aquatic life with a   HB5136 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1dip net is not permitted within 100 feet of the base of any 2dam. 3    Any sport fishing device, including trot line device, bank 4pole, and throw line or buoyed ganging devices, left 5unattended must be tagged with the name, and mailing address, 6and phone number of the operator. All required tags shall be in 7a position to be at all times exposed to public view.8    A sport fishing license permits the holder to seine for 9minnows, provided that minnows are not sold. The seine shall 10not be longer than 20 feet, deeper than 6 feet, or contain mesh 11larger than 1/2 inch bar measurement.12(Source: P.A. 89-66, eff. 1-1-96.) 13    (515 ILCS 5/10-140)  (from Ch. 56, par. 10-140)14    Sec. 10-140. Seines Dip nets, minnow traps, casting nets, 15and shad scoops. 16    (a) Any individual possessing a valid sport fishing 17license may use a seine, minnow trap dip net, casting net, or 18shad scoop to take certain species. The taking of aquatic life 19with a seine, minnow trap dip net, casting net, or shad scoop 20shall not be permitted within 100 feet of the base of any dam.21    (b) Minnows, shad, common carp and crayfish may be taken 22with a seine for use as bait on the water body where taken Dip 23nets may be used to take carp, buffalo, carpsuckers, or shad 24for personal consumption.25    (c) Minnows and crayfish may be taken with a minnow trap   HB5136 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1for use as bait on the water body where taken. Any minnow trap 2left unattended must be tagged with the name, mailing address, 3and phone number of the operator. 4    (d) (c) Bighead carp (Hypophthalmichthys nobilis), black 5carp (Mylopharyngodon piceus), grass carp (Ctenopharyngodon 6idella), and silver carp (Hypophthalmichthys molitrix) may be 7taken with a casting net or shad scoop and used for bait on the 8body of water where they are collected if they are killed 9immediately.10    (e) (d) Mooneye (Hiodon tergisus), goldeye (Hiodon 11alosoides), skipjack herring (Alosa chrysochloris), carp 12(other than bighead carp (Hypophthalmichthys nobilis), black 13carp (Mylopharyngodon piceus), grass carp (Ctenopharyngodon 14idella), and silver carp (Hypophthalmichthys molitrix)), and 15any other fish listed in Section 10-110 of this Code may be 16taken with a casting net or shad scoop and used for live or 17dead bait on the body of water where they are collected.18    (f) No seines shall be longer than 20 feet or deeper than 6 19feet or contain mesh larger than 1/2 inch bar measurement. All 20minnow traps shall not be more than 24 inches in width or 21diameter or 36 inches in length or shall use a mesh larger than 221/2 inch bar measurement. (e) All casting nets shall not be (1) 23larger than 24 feet in diameter or (2) of a mesh larger than 1 24inch bar measurement. All shad scoops shall not be (1) larger 25than 30 inches in diameter, (2) of a mesh not larger than 1/2 26inch bar measurement, or (3) longer than 4 feet in length.  HB5136 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1    (g) (f) Fish taken by means listed in this Section shall 2not be sold or bartered. Except as otherwise provided by law, 3the taking of species other than those listed in this Section 4by sport fishing devices game fish by dip net without a 5commercial fishing license shall be a petty offense punishable 6by a minimum fine of $100, plus confiscation of illegally used 7equipment under Article 1 of this Code.8(Source: P.A. 102-837, eff. 5-13-22.) 9    (515 ILCS 5/10-150)10    Sec. 10-150. Fishing limits; private property. The limits 11established in this Article on the number and length size of 12fish a person may take in a day do not apply to a person 13fishing in waters wholly within his or her private property.14(Source: P.A. 99-532, eff. 7-8-16.) 15    (515 ILCS 5/15-50)  (from Ch. 56, par. 15-50)16    Sec. 15-50. Regulation. Except as provided in Section 1720-90 no person shall buy, sell or barter, or offer to buy, 18sell or barter, nor shall any commercial institution or any 19regularly operated refrigerated storage establishment have in 20its possession, aquatic life protected by this Code except 21those species taken under the conditions and of the size or 22length described in Sections 15-55 and 15-60 and 23administrative rules pertaining to the taking of commercial 24fish or mussels. Any person who is found guilty of violating   HB5136 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1this Section shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.2(Source: P.A. 87-833.) 3    (515 ILCS 5/15-60)  (from Ch. 56, par. 15-60)4    Sec. 15-60. Legal length size; various species. When taken 5from waters wholly or in part within the boundaries of the 6State of Illinois, except from the Ohio River, the following 7species shall be not less in length size than provided in this 8Section: channel catfish, flathead catfish, blue catfish, or 9white catfish, 15 inches in length undressed or 12 inches in 10length dressed.11(Source: P.A. 90-57, eff. 1-1-98.) 12    (515 ILCS 5/15-100)  (from Ch. 56, par. 15-100)13    Sec. 15-100. Length and mesh size of seine. Except as 14provided in Sections 20-5 through 20-25, any commercial 15fisherman as defined in this Code person may use a single seine 16not exceeding 100 yards in length of 1 1/2 inch bar 17measurement. In all seines over 100 yards in length it shall be 18unlawful at any time to use any mesh less than 2 inch bar 19measurement except that all seines over 100 yards in length 20may have a section of the seine not more than 300 feet in 21length of 1 1/2 inch bar measurement. No seine shall be more 22than 1500 yards in length. If seines are more than 200 yards in 23length they must be operated with a backstop constructed of 24vertical slats not less than 1 1/4 inches apart or 3 inch bar   HB5136 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1measurement netting or of chicken wire or metallic cloths of 2not less than 1 1/2 inches square and shall not be dragged or 3otherwise operated in less than 2 feet of water.4(Source: P.A. 87-833.) 5    (515 ILCS 5/15-120)  (from Ch. 56, par. 15-120)6    Sec. 15-120. Mesh size of dip nets. It shall be unlawful to 7use any dip net having a mesh less than 1 1/2 inches bar 8measurement or more than 15 feet in length, width, square or in 9diameter.10(Source: P.A. 87-833.) 11    (515 ILCS 5/15-125)  (from Ch. 56, par. 15-125)12    Sec. 15-125. Live box or live net. All live boxes and live 13nets in which any aquatic life protected by this Code is held 14shall be plainly labeled with the name, and address, and phone 15number of the owner.16(Source: P.A. 87-833.) 17    (515 ILCS 5/15-130)  (from Ch. 56, par. 15-130)18    Sec. 15-130. Gill or trammel net. It shall be unlawful to 19use a gill or trammel net except in the Mississippi River, in 20the Ohio River, and in the Illinois River from its mouth up to 21the Illinois River bridge, Highway Route 89, including 22adjacent backwaters but not above the mouth of any stream, 23ditch, or tributary connected to these backwaters. No gill or   HB5136 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1trammel net shall be less than 100 feet in length.2    All gill or trammel nets that are set in any body of water 3shall be under the immediate supervision of the operator, who 4may be the licensee or his or her employee, except (i) from May 51 to September 30, (ii) when the nets are set under the ice, 6(iii) from sunset to sunrise, or (iv) as specified by 7administrative rule. Immediate supervision shall be defined as 8the operator being on the waters where the nets are set to be 9readily available to identify the nets to law enforcement 10officers empowered to enforce this Code. It shall be unlawful 11for any employee on any one day to lift or attend nets of more 12than one licensee.13    All gill or trammel nets set under the ice shall be at a 14distance of not less than 100 yards from any natural opening in 15the ice.16    A net shall be defined as a "trammel net" for the purposes 17of enforcing this Code if: (i) there are no less than 3 panels 18of mesh tied to a single float and lead line; (ii) the outer 19panels of mesh are constructed of a number 9 or larger diameter 20twine; (iii) the outer panels of mesh are diamond shaped and no 21greater than 40 inch bar measure; and (iv) the inner panel of 22mesh is not less than 2 inches bar measure. 23    A net shall be defined as a "gill net" for the purposes of 24enforcing this Code if it is constructed of a single panel of 25mesh that is not less than 3 inches bar measure that is tied to 26a single float and lead line.   HB5136 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1    The Department may modify provisions of this Section as 2provided in Section 1-125 1-135.3(Source: P.A. 102-724, eff. 1-1-23.) 4    (515 ILCS 5/15-145)  (from Ch. 56, par. 15-145)5    Sec. 15-145. Tagging commercial devices. It shall be the 6responsibility of each person licensed as a commercial 7fisherman or musselor to furnish and attach to each commercial 8device being used a metal tag inscribed with the name, and 9address, and phone number of the licensee. Absence of this 10tagging shall be prima facie evidence that the commercial 11fishing or mussel device or devices are illegally used and the 12devices shall be confiscated and disposed of as directed by 13the Department.14(Source: P.A. 87-833.) 15    (515 ILCS 5/20-5)  (from Ch. 56, par. 20-5)16    Sec. 20-5. Necessity of license; exemptions. 17    (a) Any person taking or attempting to take any fish, 18including minnows for commercial purposes, turtles, mussels, 19crayfish, or frogs by any means whatever in any waters or lands 20wholly or in part within the jurisdiction of the State, 21including that part of Lake Michigan under the jurisdiction of 22this State, shall first obtain a license to do so, and shall do 23so only during the respective periods of the year when it shall 24be lawful as provided in this Code. Individuals under 16,   HB5136 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1blind residents or residents with a disability, or individuals 2fishing at fee fishing areas licensed by the Department, 3however, may fish with sport fishing devices without being 4required to have a license. For the purpose of this Section an 5individual is blind or has a disability if that individual has 6a Class 2 disability as defined in Section 4A of the Illinois 7Identification Card Act. For purposes of this Section an 8Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card issued 9under the Illinois Identification Card Act indicating that the 10individual named on the card has a Class 2 disability shall be 11adequate documentation of a disability.12    (b) A courtesy non-resident sport fishing license or stamp 13may be issued at the discretion of the Director, without fee, 14to (i) any individual officially employed in the wildlife and 15fish or conservation department of another state or of the 16United States who is within the State to assist or consult or 17cooperate with the Director or (ii) the officials of other 18states, the United States, foreign countries, or officers or 19representatives of conservation organizations or publications 20while in the State as guests of the Governor or Director.21    (c) The Director may issue special fishing permits without 22cost to groups of hospital patients or to individuals with 23disabilities for use on specified dates in connection with 24supervised fishing for therapy.25    (d) Veterans who, as certified by the United States 26Department of Veterans Affairs, are at least 10% disabled with   HB5136 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1service-related disabilities or in receipt of total disability 2pensions may fish with sport fishing devices during those 3periods of the year it is lawful to do so without being 4required to have a license, on the condition that their 5respective disabilities do not prevent them from fishing in a 6manner which is safe to themselves and others.7    (e) Each year the Director may designate a period, not to 8exceed 4 days in duration, when sport fishermen may fish 9waters wholly or in part within the jurisdiction of the State, 10including that part of Lake Michigan under the jurisdiction of 11the State, and not be required to obtain the license or stamp 12required by subsection (a) of this Section, Section 20-10, 13Section 20-11, or subsection (a) of Section 20-55. The term of 14any such period shall be established by administrative rule. 15This subsection shall not apply to commercial fishing.16    (f) The Director may issue special fishing permits without 17cost for a group event, restricted to specific dates and 18locations if it is determined by the Department that the event 19is beneficial in promoting sport fishing in Illinois.20(Source: P.A. 104-234, eff. 8-15-25; 104-435, eff. 11-21-25.) 21    (515 ILCS 5/20-10)  (from Ch. 56, par. 20-10)22    Sec. 20-10. Salmon stamp. Any individual taking or 23attempting to take salmon in Lake Michigan shall, in addition 24to any other license required by this Code, first obtain a 25salmon stamp authorized by the Department and affix it to his   HB5136 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1or her license. Individuals not required to obtain a license 2are not required to obtain a salmon stamp.3(Source: P.A. 87-135; 87-833; 87-895; 88-91.) 4    (515 ILCS 5/20-45)  (from Ch. 56, par. 20-45)5    Sec. 20-45. License fees for residents. Fees for licenses 6for residents of the State of Illinois shall be as follows:7        (a) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, for 8    sport fishing devices as defined in Section 10-95 or 9    spearing devices as defined in Section 10-110, the fee is 10    $14.50 for individuals 16 to 64 years old, one-half of the 11    current fishing license fee for individuals age 65 or 12    older, and, commencing with the 2012 license year, 13    one-half of the current fishing license fee for resident 14    veterans of the United States Armed Forces after returning 15    from service abroad or mobilization by the President of 16    the United States as an active duty member of the United 17    States Armed Forces, the Illinois National Guard, or the 18    Reserves of the United States Armed Forces. Veterans must 19    provide to the Department acceptable verification of their 20    service. The Department shall establish by administrative 21    rule the procedure by which such verification of service 22    shall be made to the Department for the purpose of issuing 23    fishing licenses to resident veterans at a reduced fee.24        (a-3) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, 25    for sport fishing devices as defined in Section 10-95 or   HB5136 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1    spearing devices as defined in Section 10-110, residents 2    of this State may obtain a 3-year fishing license. The fee 3    for a 3-year fishing license is 3 times the annual fee. For 4    residents age 65 or older, the fee is one half of the fee 5    charged for a 3-year fishing license. For resident 6    veterans of the United States Armed Forces after returning 7    from service abroad or mobilization by the President of 8    the United States, the fee is one-half of the fee charged 9    for a 3-year fishing license. Veterans must provide to the 10    Department, per administrative rule, verification of their 11    service. The Department shall establish what constitutes 12    suitable verification of service for the purpose of 13    issuing 3-year fishing licenses to resident veterans at a 14    reduced fee. 15        (a-5) The fee for all sport fishing licenses shall be 16    $1 for an annual license and 3 times the annual fee for a 17    3-year license for residents over 75 years of age. 18        (b) All residents before using any commercial fishing 19    device shall obtain a commercial fishing license, the fee 20    for which shall be $60, and a resident fishing license, 21    the fee for which is $14.50. Each and every commercial 22    device used shall be licensed by a resident commercial 23    fisherman as follows:24            (1) For each 100 lineal yards, or fraction 25        thereof, of seine the fee is $18. For each minnow 26        seine, minnow trap, or net for commercial purposes the   HB5136 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1        fee is $20.2            (2) For each device to fish with a 100 hook trot 3        line device, basket trap, hoop net, or dip net the fee 4        is $3.5            (3) When used in the waters of Lake Michigan, for 6        the first 2000 lineal feet, or fraction thereof, of 7        gill net the fee is $10; and for each 1000 additional 8        lineal feet, or fraction thereof, the fee is $10. 9        These fees shall apply to all gill nets in use in the 10        water or on drying reels on the shore.11            (4) For each 100 lineal yards, or fraction 12        thereof, of gill net or trammel net the fee is $18.13        (c) Residents of this State may obtain a sportsmen's 14    combination license that shall entitle the holder to the 15    same non-commercial fishing privileges as residents 16    holding a license as described in subsection (a) of this 17    Section and to the same hunting privileges as residents 18    holding a license to hunt all species as described in 19    Section 3.1 of the Wildlife Code. No sportsmen's 20    combination license shall be issued to any individual who 21    would be ineligible for either the fishing or hunting 22    license separately. The sportsmen's combination license 23    fee shall be $25.50. For residents age 65 or older, the fee 24    is one-half of the fee charged for a sportsmen's 25    combination license. For resident veterans of the United 26    States Armed Forces after returning from service abroad or   HB5136 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1    mobilization by the President of the United States as an 2    active duty member of the United States Armed Forces, the 3    Illinois National Guard, or the Reserves of the United 4    States Armed Forces, the fee, commencing with the 2012 5    license year, is one-half of the fee charged for a 6    sportsmen's combination license. Veterans must provide to 7    the Department acceptable verification of their service. 8    The Department shall establish by administrative rule the 9    procedure by which such verification of service shall be 10    made to the Department for the purpose of issuing 11    sportsmen's combination licenses to resident veterans at a 12    reduced fee.13        (c-5) Residents of this State may obtain a 3-year 14    sportsmen's combination license that shall entitle the 15    holder to the same non-commercial fishing privileges as 16    residents holding a license as described in subsection 17    (a-3) and to the same hunting privileges as residents 18    holding a license to hunt all species as described in 19    Section 3.1 of the Wildlife Code. A 3-year sportsmen's 20    combination license shall not be issued to any individual 21    who would be ineligible for either the fishing or hunting 22    license separately. The 3-year sportsmen's combination 23    license fee shall be 3 times the annual fee. For residents 24    age 65 or older, the fee is one-half of the fee charged for 25    a 3-year sportsmen's combination license. For resident 26    veterans of the United States Armed Forces after returning   HB5136 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1    from service abroad or mobilization by the President of 2    the United States, the fee is one-half of the fee charged 3    for a 3-year sportsmen's combination license. Veterans 4    must provide to the Department, per administrative rule, 5    verification of their service. The Department shall 6    establish what constitutes suitable verification of 7    service for the purpose of issuing 3-year sportsmen's 8    combination licenses to resident veterans at a reduced 9    fee. 10        (d) For 24 hours of fishing by sport fishing devices 11    as defined in Section 10-95 or by spearing devices as 12    defined in Section 10-110 the fee is $5. This license does 13    not exempt the licensee from the requirement for a salmon 14    or inland trout stamp. The licenses provided for by this 15    subsection are not required for residents of the State of 16    Illinois who have obtained the license provided for in 17    subsection (a) or (a-3) of this Section.18        (e) All residents before using any commercial mussel 19    device shall obtain a commercial mussel license, the fee 20    for which shall be $50.21        (f) Residents of this State, upon establishing 22    residency as required by the Department, may obtain a 23    lifetime hunting or fishing license or lifetime 24    sportsmen's combination license which shall entitle the 25    holder to the same non-commercial fishing privileges as 26    residents holding a license as described in subsection   HB5136 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1    paragraph (a) of this Section and to the same hunting 2    privileges as residents holding a license to hunt all 3    species as described in Section 3.1 of the Wildlife Code, 4    unless otherwise stated in this Section. No lifetime 5    sportsmen's combination license shall be issued to or 6    retained by any individual who would be ineligible for 7    either the fishing or hunting license separately, either 8    upon issuance, or in any year a violation would subject an 9    individual to have either or both fishing or hunting 10    privileges rescinded. The lifetime hunting and fishing 11    license fees shall be as follows:12            (1) Lifetime fishing: 30 x the current fishing 13        license fee.14            (2) Lifetime hunting: 30 x the current hunting 15        license fee.16            (3) Lifetime sportsmen's combination license: 30 x 17        the current sportsmen's combination license fee.18    Lifetime licenses shall not be refundable. A $10 fee shall 19be charged for reissuing any lifetime license. 20Except in the case of the reissuance of a previously purchased 21lifetime license, the holder of a lifetime fishing or hunting 22license or a lifetime sportsmen's combination license that is 23purchased on or after January 1, 2027 must pay the 24corresponding resident or non-resident fee when purchasing any 25permits or stamps required by this Code or the Wildlife Code 26based on the license holder's current permanent abode at the   HB5136 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1time of purchasing the permit or stamp. If the lifetime 2license holder does not live in Illinois at the time of 3application for any lotteries, drawings, permits, or stamps 4that are issued or held pursuant to this Code, the Wildlife 5Code, or any administrative rules issued pursuant to this Code 6or the Wildlife Code, the lifetime license holder shall be 7considered a non-resident for purposes of all lotteries, 8drawings, permits, or stamps issued or held pursuant to this 9Code, the Wildlife Code, or any administrative rules issued 10pursuant to this Code or the Wildlife Code.11    The Department may establish rules and regulations for the 12issuance and use of lifetime licenses and may suspend or 13revoke any lifetime license issued under this Section for 14violations of those rules or regulations or other provisions 15under this Code or the Wildlife Code, or a violation of the 16United States Code that involves the taking, possessing, 17killing, harvesting, transportation, selling, exporting, or 18importing any fish or aquatic life protected by this Code or 19the taking, possessing, killing, harvesting, transportation, 20selling, exporting, or importing any fauna protected by the 21Wildlife Code when any part of the United States Code 22violation occurred in Illinois. Individuals under 16 years of 23age who possess a lifetime hunting or sportsmen's combination 24license shall have in their possession, while in the field, a 25certificate of competency as required under Section 3.2 of the 26Wildlife Code. Any lifetime license issued under this Section   HB5136 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1shall not exempt individuals from obtaining additional stamps 2or permits required under the provisions of this Code or the 3Wildlife Code. Individuals required to purchase additional 4stamps shall sign the stamps and have them in their possession 5while fishing or hunting with a lifetime license. All fees 6received from the issuance of lifetime licenses shall be 7deposited in the Fish and Wildlife Endowment Fund.8    Except for licenses issued under subsection (e) of this 9Section, all licenses provided for in this Section shall 10expire on March 31 of each year, except that the license 11provided for in subsection (d) of this Section shall expire 24 12hours after the effective date and time listed on the face of 13the license. Licenses issued under subsection (a-3) or (c-5) 14shall expire on March 31 of the 2nd year after the year in 15which the license is issued. 16    The Department shall by administrative rule provide for 17the automatic renewal of a fishing license upon the request of 18the applicant. 19    All individuals required to have and failing to have the 20license provided for in subsection (a), (a-3), or (d) of this 21Section shall be fined according to the provisions of Section 2220-35 of this Code.23    All individuals required to have and failing to have the 24licenses provided for in subsections (b) and (e) of this 25Section shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.26    (g) For the purposes of this Section, "acceptable   HB5136 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1verification" means official documentation from the Department 2of Defense or the appropriate Major Command showing 3mobilization dates or service abroad dates, including: (i) a 4DD-214, (ii) a letter from the Illinois Department of Military 5Affairs for members of the Illinois National Guard, (iii) a 6letter from the Regional Reserve Command for members of the 7Armed Forces Reserve, (iv) a letter from the Major Command 8covering Illinois for active duty members, (v) personnel 9records for mobilized State employees, and (vi) any other 10documentation that the Department, by administrative rule, 11deems acceptable to establish dates of mobilization or service 12abroad. 13    For the purposes of this Section, the term "service 14abroad" means active duty service outside of the 50 United 15States and the District of Columbia, and includes all active 16duty service in territories and possessions of the United 17States. 18(Source: P.A. 102-780, eff. 5-13-22; 102-837, eff. 5-13-22; 19103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-456, eff. 1-1-24; revised 7-3-25.) 20    (515 ILCS 5/20-50)  (from Ch. 56, par. 20-50)21    Sec. 20-50. Salmon stamp fee. The fee for a salmon stamp 22shall be $6 for both resident and non-resident licensees. The 23fee for a salmon stamp shall be waived for residents over 75 24years of age. Every person shall sign the salmon stamp or affix 25the salmon stamp to his or her license. These stamps shall   HB5136 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1expire on March 31 of each year. All individuals required to 2have and failing to have a salmon stamp as provided in Section 320-10 of this Code shall be guilty of a petty offense.4(Source: P.A. 98-800, eff. 8-1-14.) 5    (515 ILCS 5/20-90)  (from Ch. 56, par. 20-90)6    Sec. 20-90. Aquaculture permits. Any person who shall 7engage in the breeding, hatching, propagation, or raising of 8aquatic life, whether indigenous or non-indigenous to this 9State, shall first procure a permit from the Department to do 10so. Aquatic life specified, which is bred, hatched, propagated 11or raised by a person holding a permit as provided for in this 12Section, may be transported and sold for food or stocking 13purposes. Permittees who sell aquatic life propagated or 14raised under this permit are exempt from possessing a fish or 15minnow dealers license.16    Aquaculture permit holders shall maintain records of all 17aquatic life bought, sold or shipped. These records shall 18include the name and address of the buyer and seller, the 19appropriate license or permit number of the buyer and seller, 20the date of the transaction, and the species, poundage, and 21origin of aquatic life involved. The records shall be kept for 22a minimum of 2 years from the date of the transaction and shall 23be made immediately available to authorized employees of the 24Department upon request. Records of the annual operations, as 25may be required by the Department, shall be forwarded to the   HB5136 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1Department upon request.2    Nothing in this Section shall be construed to give 3permittees authority to take aquatic life in their wild or 4natural state, contrary to other provisions of this Code, or 5to remove the permittee from responsibility for the observance 6of any federal, State, or local laws, rules, or regulations 7that may apply to the aquatic life.8    Aquaculture permit holders may harvest aquatic life on 9licensed aquaculture facilities with commercial fishing 10devices without obtaining any license for these devices.11    Before any person imports or receives live, non-indigenous 12aquatic life for aquaculture or stocking purposes in this 13State, permission must be obtained from the Department. 14Regulations governing non-indigenous aquatic life shall be 15covered by administrative rule.16    The annual fee for a permit under this Section shall be $50 17and the permit shall expire on March 31 of each year.18    Any person who violates any provisions of this Section, 19including administrative rules relating to this Section, shall 20be guilty of a business offense and fined not less than $1,000 21and no more than $5,000.22    Permitted aquaculture facilities are exempt from length 23size, catch, and possession limits and seasons on aquatic life 24when harvested, sold, or transported, except when taken by 25sport fishing devices.26    All permits issued under this Section are valid only in   HB5136 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1the location described and designated in the application for 2such permit.3(Source: P.A. 100-256, eff. 1-1-18.) 4    (515 ILCS 5/20-95)  (from Ch. 56, par. 20-95)5    Sec. 20-95. Daily fee fishing area. Any person owning, 6controlling, or operating a water area, including access to 7this water area, that is used for fishing by those either 8directly or indirectly paying a daily fee for fishing shall 9make application to the Department for a license as provided 10in this Section. Upon receipt of an application, the 11Department shall inspect the proposed licensed area described 12in the application, the size and number of water areas, source 13of fish for stocking, species of fish to be stocked and 14determine the ability of the applicant to properly supervise a 15property of this character. If the Department finds that (i) 16the area is suitable for the purpose intended, (ii) the 17operation of the property is not a menace or being established 18contrary to the laws of this State, (iii) the operations of the 19fee fishing area will not work a fraud upon individuals 20utilizing the facilities, and (iv) the issuing of the license 21will be in the public interest, then the Department shall 22approve the application and issue a license to operate a 23"Daily Fee Fishing Area" as described in the application.24    The fee for a license issued under this Section shall be 25$50 annually, and the license shall expire on March 31   HB5136 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1following its issuance.2    Records of the season's operations, as may be required by 3the Department, shall be forwarded to the Department by the 4licensee within 30 days after the expiration date of the 5license.6    The Department may refuse to issue, refuse to renew, 7suspend, or revoke any license issued under this Section if 8the Department finds that the licensed area or its operator is 9not in compliance with this Section. The Department, unless 10authorized pursuant to Section 20-105, however, shall not 11refuse to issue or renew, or suspend or revoke, any license for 12any cause other than the protection of public health and 13safety or if the area is operated unlawfully, unless the 14licensee affected is given at least 15 days' days notice, in 15writing, of the reasons for the action of the Department and 16given an opportunity to appear before the Department or its 17representative in opposition to the action of the Department. 18The Department shall adopt administrative rules establishing 19revocation and suspension procedures. 20(Source: P.A. 100-256, eff. 1-1-18.) 21    (515 ILCS 5/20-105)  (from Ch. 56, par. 20-105)22    Sec. 20-105. Revocation and suspension; refusal to issue. 23    (a) Whenever a license or permit is issued to any person 24under this Code and its holder pleads guilty, is found guilty, 25or receives court supervision for: (1) of any   HB5136 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1misrepresentation in obtaining the license or permit; (2) or 2of a violation of Section 48-3 of the Criminal Code of 2012; 3(3) or a violation of any of the provisions of this Code, 4including administrative rules; or (4) , or a violation of the 5United States Code that involves the taking, possessing, 6killing, harvesting, transportation, selling, exporting, or 7importing any aquatic life protected by this Code when any 8part of the United States Code violation occurred in Illinois, 9the license or permit may be revoked by the Department and the 10Department may refuse to issue any permit or license to that 11person and may suspend the person from engaging in the 12activity requiring the permit or license for a period of time 13as established by administrative rule, unless otherwise 14specified in this Act not to exceed 5 years following the 15revocation. Department revocation or suspension procedures 16procedure shall be established by administrative rule.17    (b) Whenever any person who has not been issued a license 18or a permit under the provisions of this Code pleads guilty to, 19is found guilty of, or receives court supervision for any of 20the following: (1) a violation of Section 48-3 of the Criminal 21Code of 2012; (2) or a violation of the provisions of this 22Code, including administrative rules; or (3) , or a violation 23of the United States Code that involves the taking, 24possessing, killing, harvesting, transportation, selling, 25exporting, or importing any aquatic life protected by this 26Code when any part of the United States Code violation   HB5136 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1occurred in Illinois, the Department may refuse to issue any 2permit or license to that person, and suspend that person from 3engaging in the activity requiring the permit or license for a 4period of time as established by administrative rule, unless 5otherwise specified in this Act not to exceed 5 years.6    (c) Any person who knowingly or intentionally violates any 7of the provisions of this Code, including administrative 8rules, during the 5 years following the revocation of his or 9her license or permit under subsection (a) or during the time 10he is suspended under subsection (b), shall be guilty of a 11Class A misdemeanor as provided in Section 20-35. The 12penalties for a violation of Section 48-3 of the Criminal Code 13of 2012 shall be as provided in that Section.14    (d) A person whose license or permit to engage in any 15activity regulated by this Code has been suspended or revoked 16may not, during the period of the suspension or revocation or 17until obtaining such a license or permit, (i) be in the company 18of any person engaging in the activity covered by the 19suspension or revocation or (ii) serve as a guide, outfitter, 20or facilitator for a person who is engaged or prepared to 21engage in the activity covered by the suspension or 22revocation.23    (e) No person may be issued or obtain a license or permit 24or engage in any activity regulated by this Code during the 25time that the person's privilege to engage in the same or 26similar activities is suspended or revoked by another state,   HB5136 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1by a federal agency, or by a province of Canada.2    (f) Any person whose license, stamps, permits, or any 3other privilege issued by the Department has been suspended or 4revoked shall immediately return proof of such privileges to 5the Department. The Department, or any law enforcement entity, 6is authorized to take possession of any proof of privileges. 7Any person failing to comply with this subsection by 8possessing a suspended or revoked license, stamp, or permit 9issued by the Department after having received written notice 10from the Department or any other State agency or department of 11such suspension or revocation is guilty of a Class A 12misdemeanor.13    (g) The Department shall suspend the privileges of any 14person who pleads guilty, is found guilty, or receives court 15supervision for a violation of Section 20-95. The Department 16may refuse to issue, refuse to renew, suspend, or revoke any 17license issued under Section 20-95 if the Department finds 18that the licensed area or its operator is not in compliance 19with Section 20-95. The Department, however, shall not 20suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew any license 21issued under Section 20-95 for any cause other than the 22protection of public health and safety or, if the area is 23operated unlawfully, unless the licensee affected is given at 24least 15 days' notice, in writing, of the reasons for the 25action of the Department and given an opportunity to appear 26before the Department or its representative in opposition to   HB5136 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1the action of the Department.2    (h) The Department shall not reinstate any fishing 3privileges that were suspended or revoked under this Code 4while that person still owes any court-ordered fines, fees, 5penalties, or any reinstatement fee issued by the Department 6under the Department of Natural Resources (Conservation) Law 7of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 8(Source: P.A. 102-837, eff. 5-13-22; 103-456, eff. 1-1-24.) 9    (515 ILCS 5/1-15 rep.)10    (515 ILCS 5/1-17 rep.)11    (515 ILCS 5/1-18 rep.)12    (515 ILCS 5/1-20 rep.)13    (515 ILCS 5/1-20.5 rep.)14    (515 ILCS 5/1-25 rep.)15    (515 ILCS 5/1-26 rep.)16    (515 ILCS 5/1-27 rep.)17    (515 ILCS 5/1-30 rep.)18    (515 ILCS 5/1-35 rep.)19    (515 ILCS 5/1-40 rep.)20    (515 ILCS 5/1-45 rep.)21    (515 ILCS 5/1-50 rep.)22    (515 ILCS 5/1-51 rep.)23    (515 ILCS 5/1-53 rep.)24    (515 ILCS 5/1-55 rep.)25    (515 ILCS 5/1-60 rep.)  HB5136 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 18209 BDA 31648 b1    (515 ILCS 5/1-65 rep.)2    (515 ILCS 5/1-70 rep.)3    (515 ILCS 5/1-75 rep.)4    (515 ILCS 5/1-80 rep.)5    (515 ILCS 5/1-85 rep.)6    (515 ILCS 5/1-90 rep.)7    (515 ILCS 5/1-91 rep.)8    (515 ILCS 5/1-95 rep.)9    (515 ILCS 5/1-100 rep.)10    (515 ILCS 5/1-103 rep.)11    (515 ILCS 5/1-105 rep.)12    (515 ILCS 5/1-110 rep.)13    (515 ILCS 5/1-115 rep.)14    (515 ILCS 5/1-116 rep.)15    (515 ILCS 5/1-117 rep.)16    Section 10. The Fish and Aquatic Life Code is amended by 17repealing Sections 1-15, 1-17, 1-18, 1-20, 1-20.5, 1-25, 1-26, 181-27, 1-30, 1-35, 1-40, 1-45, 1-50, 1-51, 1-53, 1-55, 1-60, 191-65, 1-70, 1-75, 1-80, 1-85, 1-90, 1-91, 1-95, 1-100, 1-103, 201-105, 1-110, 1-115, 1-116, and 1-117.